Louisiana, session 2026, HB628.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:407.22.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§407.22.2. Microcenter programs
A.(1) Each city, parish, or other local public school board may engage in a
cooperative endeavor with an early learning center for the purpose of creating and
establishing a microcenter program for the care and education of three-year-olds.
(2) For the purposes of this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(a) "Early learning center" means a licensed Type III provider.
(b) "Microcenter program" means an early learning center operating in a
school.
B. A microcenter program is required to meet all accountability standards
of a licensed Type III provider.
C. In establishing a program, the school board shall prioritize economically
disadvantaged three-year-olds.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1260 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 628